Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4013.1 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In the case of any life insurance policy with a value of Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or less, proof of death may be
furnished by submission of a certified certificate of death with a
pending manner or cause, accompanied by a sworn statement by the
funeral director who conducted burial services that the certificate
is authentic and the death has occurred.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15637 MJ 01/12/26

Req. No. 15637 Page 1